District of Columbia statutes.
8-109.08

Judicial review.

Where an EIS is prepared in connection with the issuance or approval of a lease, permit, license, certificate, or any other entitlement or permission to act by a District government agency that is subject to administrative or judicial review under applicable laws or regulations, the administrative or judicial review shall be governed by the applicable laws and regulations.

Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-36, § 9, 36 DCR 5741
1981 Ed., § 6-988.